Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 10

Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission

Publisher's Notes.

Former chapter 10 was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 783, § 2. The former chapter was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1217, § 1, and Acts 1999, No. 556, § 1.

Former chapter 10, concerning county record retention, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 800, § 11. The former chapter was derived from the following sources:

13-10-101. Acts 1989, No. 573, § 1.

13-10-102. Acts 1989, No. 573, § 2.

13-10-103. Acts 1989, No. 573, § 3.

13-10-104. Acts 1989, No. 573, §§ 4, 5.

For current law, see §13-4-301 et seq.

13-10-101. Creation — Duties.

(a)

There is created the Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission.

(b)

The Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission shall be composed of:

(1)

The Secretary of State, or his or her designee; and

(2)

Four (4) commissioners appointed by the Governor.

(c)

The Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission shall:

(1)

Meet as necessary to review and approve the names of Medal of Honor recipients submitted for possible inclusion on the Arkansas Medal of Honor Memorial;

(2)

Provide the Secretary of State the names of Medal of Honor recipients that are to be added to the Arkansas Medal of Honor Memorial;

(3)

Provide the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission design and layout recommendations for the adding of Medal of Honor recipients' names to the Arkansas Medal of Honor Memorial; and

(4)

Solicit, receive, and disburse funds necessary to accomplish the Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission's duties under this subsection.

(d)

State funding shall not be utilized to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 926, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 926, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Several Arkansans have been awarded the Medal of Honor and deserve recognition for their service to this country;

“(2)

An Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission was created by Acts 1997, No. 1217, and Acts 1999, No. 564, authorized the construction and maintenance of a monument on the State Capitol grounds to honor Medal of Honor recipients from Arkansas;

“(3)

The Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission was abolished by Acts 2001, No. 783;

“(4)

A new Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission is necessary to solicit the funding for the design, construction, and dedication of additional plaques on the Arkansas Medal of Honor Memorial to honor new Medal of Honor recipients.”